apertium-tr-ky.ky.twol
"Deletion of {n} before genitive {N}s"
!%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: [ %{N%}: - %{N%}:0 ] ;
!%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{N%}: %{I%}: [ %{N%} | к ]  ;
%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{N%}: %{I%}: \[ .#. ]  ;

"Deletion of ablative-initial {D} after {n}"
%{D%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ %{A%}: :н ;

!"Deletion of extra {I} for accusative after {n}"
!!%{N%}%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ .#. ;
!!%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: %{N%}: _ .#. ;
!%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: %{N%}:0 _ .#. ;
!!%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: %{N%}:0 _ \п ;
!!%{N%}%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ .#. ;
!%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: %{N%}:0 _ .#. ;

"Deletion of dative {G} after px1sg, px2sg"
!%{G%}:0 <=> :NasalCns* (%>:) _ ;
!%{G%}:0 <=> :NasalCns %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ;
%{G%}:0 <=>  %{I%}: :NasalCns %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ;
!%{G%}:0 <=>  :NasalCns %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ;

!!!! Causative stuff !!!!
!! Most of this is to convert {D}{I}р to т after a vowel (or dental sonorant) stem

"Deletion of {I} after {D} and before р"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow | :р | :л | :н ] %>: %{D%}:т _ р:0 ;

"Deletion of р after {D}{I}"
р:0 <=> [ :SurVow | :р | :н ] %>: %{D%}:т %{I%}: _ ;

"{D} to т in causative after vowel"
%{D%}:т <=> [ :SurVow | :р | :н ] %>: _ %{I%}: р: ;

!"{D}"


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!! UyanCons = м ң М Ң ;

!!SonCns = й р Й Р ;


!VoicedNonSonCns = Б В Г Д Ж З Л М Н Ң Й Р    ! This is half sonorants!
!                  б в г д ж з л м н ң й р ;
!
!VoicedNonSonCnsNoRNoY = Б В Г Д Ж З Л М Н Ң  
!                  б в г д ж з л м н ң ;

!!"Suffix vowel {I} insertion in consonant stems"
!!0:Vy <=> :LastVowel NotVowel:* Cns: %>: _ NotVowel: .#. ; 
!!      where Vy in        (   и     ү     и     и     ү     ы     ы     у     у     ы     у     у   )
!!            LastVowel in (   и     ү     е     э     ө     я     а     ё     о     ы     ю     у   )
!!       matched;

!!"Realisation of converb marker after vowels"
!!%{E%}:й <=> SurVow %>: _ ;

!!"(optional) deletion of {D} in ablative after px1sg, px2sg, px3"




! REWRITE
!"Harmonise stem ending before infinitive"
!Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ %>: %{U%}: %{U%}: ; 
!       where Vx in (  е   а   и   ы  ) 
!             Vy in (  ө   о   ү   у  )
!             matched;
!
!"Harmonise {U} in infinitives"
!%{U%}:Vx <=> Vy: %>: _ %{U%}: ; 
!       where Vx in (  ө   о   ү   у  ) 
!             Vy in (  ө   о   ү   у  )
!             matched;
!
!"{U} deletion in vowel final stem"
!%{U%}:0 <=> Vow %>: _ %{U%}: ; 

! REWRITE
!"{D} -> н after {I} and before {A} in ablative" 
!%{D%}:н <=> %{I%}: %>: _ %{A%}: н ;

! REWRITE
!"'г' deletion after uyan consonants"
!%{G%}:0 <=> UyanCons: %>: _ %{A%}: ;
! уяң means sonorants; this is wrong.
! it can't even be after м and ң, e.g., там+га, таң+га
! this should *only* be after px1sg and px2sg

! REWRITE
!"'г' desonorisation after I"
!%{G%}:н <=> %{I%}: %>: _ %{A%}: ;

! REWRITE
!"'н' addition between {I} and {D} in locative" 
!0:н <=> %{I%}: %>: _ %{D%}: %{A%}: [ \н | .#. ] ;


!иште<v><iv><inf>:иште>{U}{U}
!                 иштө>{U}{U}

! ndt	N
! ldt	L
! gk	G
! dt	D
! mbp	M


!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
!!Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel [ :Cns [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]*  [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]* | [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]* :Cns ] _ ; 
!!Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel %>: :0 Cns %>: :0 _ ;
!!Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel [ :Cns [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]*  [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]* | [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]* :Cns | [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]* :Cns [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]* ] _ ; 
!!Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* Cns WildNoVow* _ ;
!Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* [ Cns - й: ] WildNonPhon* _ ;
!        where Vx         in ( %{A%} %{A%} %{A%} %{A%} %{A%} %{A%} %{A%} %{A%} %{A%} %{A%} %{A%} %{A%} )
!              Vy         in (   е     ө     е     е     ө     а     а     о     о     а     а     а   )
!              LastVowel  in (   и     ү     е     э     ө     я     а     ё     о     ы     ю     у   )
!              matched ; 


!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I}"
!!Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel [ :Cns [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]* | [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]* :Cns ] _ [ :Cns | .#. ] ;
!!Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* Cns WildNoVow* _ ( %>: :0 ) [ ? - %{U%}: ] ;
!!Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* Cns WildNoVow* _ ~[ ( %>: :0 ) %{U%}: ] ;
!! Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* Cns WildNoVow* _ \[ [ %>: | :0 ]* %{U%}: ] ;
!Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* Cns WildNoVow* _ ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* Cns WildNonPhon* _ ;
!        where Vx         in ( %{I%} %{I%} %{I%} %{I%} %{I%} %{I%} %{I%} %{I%} %{I%} %{I%} %{I%} %{I%} )
!              Vy         in (   и     ү     и     и     ү     ы     ы     у     у     ы     у     у   )
!              LastVowel  in (   и     ү     е     э     ө     я     а     ё     о     ы     ю     у   )
!              matched ;

!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I}"
!%{I%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* Cns WildNonPhon* _ ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* [ Cns - [ й | LabialCns ] ] WildNonPhon* _ ;
!  where  Vy  in  (  и  ү  и  и  ү  ы  ы  у  у  ы  у  у ) !  ю  ю  ю  ю )
!  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у ) !  у  о  ю  ё )
!           matched ;

!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I}"
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* [ Cns - [ й: | :LabialCns ] ] WildNonPhon* _ \п ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* [ Cns - й: ] [ WildNonPhon | [ Cns - й: ] ]* _ \п: ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* [ Cns - й: ] [ WildNonPhon: | :WildNonPhon | [ Cns - й: ] ]* _ \п: ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - [ й: | :LabialCns ] ] ]/[ :0 | %>:] _ \п: ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 | %>:] _ \п: ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* [ :Cns - [ й: | %{n%}: | %{N%}: ] ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \п: ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* [ :Cns - [ й: | %{n%}:0 ] ] ]/[ [ :0 - %{n%}:0 ] | %>: ] _ \п: ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns/[ :0 ]* [ :Cns - й: ] ]/[ %>: ] _ \п: ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel Cns* [ :Cns - [ й: | %{I%}:LabialCns ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \п: ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ :Cns - [ й: | %{I%}:LabialCns | %{n%}: ] ] ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - %{N%}: ] ] _ \п: ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ :Cns - [ й: | %{I%}:LabialCns | %{n%}:н ] ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ \п: ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ :Cns - [ й: | %{I%}:LabialCns | %{n%}: | %{N%}: ] ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ \п: ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ :Cns - [ й: | %{I%}:LabialCns | %{n%}: | %{N%}:0 ] ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ \п: ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ :Cns - [ й: | %{I%}:LabialCns | %{n%}:н ] ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ \п: ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ :Cns - [ й: | %{I%}:LabialCns | %{n%}: ] ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ \п: ;
!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ :Cns - [ й: | %{I%}:LabialCns | %{n%}: ] ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ \[ р:0 | п: ] ;
!  where  Vy  in  (  и  ү  и  и  ү  ы  ы  у  у  ы  у  у )
!  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
!           matched ;


!"Lenthening of low vowels at end of verb stem in <cv_perf>"
!0:Vy <=> :ShortVowel _ :LabialCns %>: %{I%}:0 п ;
!         where !Nothing in ( 0 0 0 0 0 0 )
!                    Vy in ( э ө а а о о )
!            ShortVowel in ( е ө а я о ё ) ;

!"Lengthening of low vowels at end of verb stem in <cv_perf>"
!!Vx:Vy <=> _ LabialCns: %>: %{I%}:0 п ;
!Vx:Vy <=> _ м %>: %{I%}:0 п ;
!      where Vx in (  э  е  ө  а  я  о  ё  )
!		      Vy in (  ээ ээ өө аа яа оо ёо )
!				matched;

!"Vowel deletion for archiphoneme {I} in <cv_perf>"
!!%{I%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow | :LowVow :LabialCns ]  (%>:) _ п ;
!!%{I%}:0 <=> :LowVow :LabialCns WildNonPhon* _ ;
!!%{I%}:0 <=> :LowVow :LabialCns [ WildNonPhon: | :WildNonPhon ]* _ ;
!%{I%}:0 <=> [ :LowVow :LabialCns ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _  п ;
